Rhode Island, session 2025, SB1104.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 45-53 of the General Laws entitled "Low and Moderate Income
Housing" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
45-53-17. Minimum egress requirements for conventional subdivisions.
(a) In the town of Tiverton, any minimum egress requirements established by municipal
ordinance or regulation shall apply equally to comprehensive permit applications submitted
pursuant to chapter 53 of title 45.
(b) The minimum egress requirements applicable to conventional subdivisions shall not be
subject to waiver, modification, or reduction for comprehensive permit applications.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002918
========